Hawaii statutes.
§40-62 Payment of warrants. Every
lawful demand upon the treasury, duly audited as in this chapter provided,
shall in all cases be paid by the director of finance on the date authorized
and enfaced thereon or as soon thereafter as presented if there are sufficient
funds at that time in the treasury applicable to the payment of the demand; and
upon payment all warrants shall be canceled and proper entry made thereof. [L
1898, c 39, pt of §26; RL 1925, pt of §1462; am L 1927, c 219, pt of §9; RL
1935, pt of §588; RL 1945, pt of §1592; RL 1955, pt of §34-42; am L Sp 1959 2d,
c 1, §14; am 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §40-62]

Case Notes

A "demand" is one for the payment of money. 27 H.
143.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next